Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-251
Sequential dialing prohibited.

A person shall not connect or operate an automatic dialing-announcing device in such a manner as to allow it to dial telephone numbers sequentially which means in any manner other than a random manner. A detectable, predictable pattern which can be used to accurately project the device's number dialing shall satisfy a finding that sequential number dialing is taking place in violation of this section.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1215;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 113.